test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wicih_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wîcih - ok : # Wolvengrey VTA1 verb - p 401

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwîcihâw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwîcihânân
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihânaw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihâwâw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: wîcihêw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: wîcihêwak
     
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niwîcihâwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiwîcihâwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niwîcihânânak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihânawak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihâwâwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: wîcihêw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: wîcihêwak

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4SgO: wîcihêyiwa
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: wîcihêyiwa     

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: kiwîcihinân
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: kiwîcihinân
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kiwîcihinâwâw

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niwîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niwîcihikonân # inv +0Sg+1PlO
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiwîcihikonaw
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâw

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niwîcihikwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihikwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonânak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwak
     
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: wîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: wîcihikwak
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg+4SgO: wîcihikoyiwa

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihitin
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihitinân
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihitinân
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihitinânâw

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikîwîcihâw, nikî-wîcihâw]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikîwîcihâw, kikî-wîcihâw]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikîwîcihânân, nikî-wîcihânân]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikîwîcihânaw, kikî-wîcihânaw]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikîwîcihâwâw, kikî-wîcihâwâw]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+3SgO: [kîwîcihêw, kî-wîcihêw]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+3SgO: [kîwîcihêwak, kî-wîcihêwak]

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikîwîcihâwak, nikî-wîcihâwak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikîwîcihâwak, kikî-wîcihâwak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikîwîcihânânak, nikî-wîcihânânak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikîwîcihânawak, kikî-wîcihânawak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikîwîcihâwâwak, kikî-wîcihâwâwak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+3PlO: [kîwîcihêw, kî-wîcihêw]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+3PlO: [kîwîcihêwak, kî-wîcihêwak]

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+4SgO: [kîwîcihêyiwa, kî-wîcihêyiwa]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+4PlO: [kîwîcihêyiwa, kî-wîcihêyiwa]

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikîwîcihin, kikî-wîcihin]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1PlO: [kikîwîcihinân, kikî-wîcihinân]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1PlO: [kikîwîcihinân, kikî-wîcihinân]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikîwîcihinâwâw, kikî-wîcihinâwâw]

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+1SgO: [nikîwîcihik, nikî-wîcihik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+2SgO: [kikîwîcihik, kikî-wîcihik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+1PlO: [nikîwîcihikonân, nikî-wîcihikonân]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+12PlO: [kikîwîcihikonaw, kikî-wîcihikonaw]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+2PlO: [kikîwîcihikowâw, kikî-wîcihikowâw]

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+1SgO: [nikîwîcihikwak, nikî-wîcihikwak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+2SgO: [kikîwîcihikwak, kikî-wîcihikwak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: [nikîwîcihikonânak, nikî-wîcihikonânak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+12PlO: [kikîwîcihikonawak, kikî-wîcihikonawak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+2PlO: [kikîwîcihikowâwak, kikî-wîcihikowâwak]

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+3SgO: [kîwîcihik, kî-wîcihik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg+3PlO: [kîwîcihikwak, kî-wîcihikwak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+5Sg+4SgO: [kîwîcihikoyiwa, kî-wîcihikoyiwa]

     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2SgO: [kikîwîcihitin, kikî-wîcihitin]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2SgO: [kikîwîcihitinân, kikî-wîcihitinân]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2PlO: [kikîwîcihitinân, kikî-wîcihitinân]
     wîcih+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: [kikîwîcihitinânâw, kikî-wîcihitinânâw]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihak, êwîcihak]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihat, êwîcihat]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyâhk, êwîcihâyâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyahk, êwîcihâyahk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyêk, êwîcihâyêk]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihakik, êwîcihakik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihacik, êwîcihacik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyâhkik, êwîcihâyâhkik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyâhkok, êwîcihâyâhkok]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyêkok, êwîcihâyêkok]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4SgO: [ê-wîcihât, êwîcihât]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4SgO: [ê-wîcihâcik, êwîcihâcik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4PlO: [ê-wîcihât, êwîcihât]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4PlO: [ê-wîcihâcik, êwîcihâcik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+5SgO: [ê-wîcihâyit, êwîcihâyit]
  
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-wîcihiyan, êwîcihiyan]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: [ê-wîcihiyâhk, êwîcihiyâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: [ê-wîcihiyâhk, êwîcihiyâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-wîcihiyêk, êwîcihiyêk]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-wîcihit, êwîcihit]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-wîcihisk, êwîcihisk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhk, êwîcihikoyâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahk, êwîcihikoyahk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyek, êwîcihikoyek]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-wîcihiticik, êwîcihiticik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-wîcihiskik, êwîcihiskik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhkik, êwîcihikoyâhkik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahkok, êwîcihikoyahkok]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyêkok, êwîcihikoyêkok]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihikot, êwîcihikot]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihikocik, êwîcihikocik]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg+4PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyit, êwîcihikoyit]

     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-wîcihitân, êwîcihitân]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: [ê-wîcihitâhk, êwîcihitâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: [ê-wîcihitâhk, êwîcihitâhk]
     wîcih+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-wîcihitakok, êwîcihitakok]

     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâtân
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihihk
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâtânik
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihihkok

     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihâhkan
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkahk
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkêk
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihâhkanik
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkahkok
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkêkok

     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihinân
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihik
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihîhkan
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk
     wîcih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihîhkêk
